dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4141 N 1
SFX 4141 0 ininkiyse .

SFX 4142 N 1
SFX 4142 0 lerindekinin .

SFX 4143 N 1
SFX 4143 0 lerininkilere .

SFX 4144 N 1
SFX 4144 0 lerininkileri .

SFX 4145 N 1
SFX 4145 0 lerininkilerin .

SFX 4146 N 1
SFX 4146 0 lerininkilerle .

SFX 4147 N 1
SFX 4147 0 lerininkinin .

SFX 4148 N 1
SFX 4148 0 lerisin .

SFX 4149 N 1
SFX 4149 0 deyseler .

SFX 4150 N 1
SFX 4150 0 seymişiz .

SFX 4151 N 1
SFX 4151 0 imdekilerde .

SFX 4152 N 1
SFX 4152 0 imdekilerden .

SFX 4153 N 1
SFX 4153 0 imdekileri .

SFX 4154 N 1
SFX 4154 0 imdekilerle .

SFX 4155 N 1
SFX 4155 0 inindin .

SFX 4156 N 1
SFX 4156 0 lerinkilerle .

SFX 4157 N 1
SFX 4157 0 'ini .

SFX 4158 N 1
SFX 4158 0 indenmişim .

SFX 4159 N 1
SFX 4159 0 indensin .

SFX 4160 N 1
SFX 4160 0 iyleymiş .

SFX 4161 N 1
SFX 4161 0 lermişim .

SFX 4162 N 1
SFX 4162 0 lermişsin .

SFX 4163 N 1
SFX 4163 0 tiydiniz .

SFX 4164 N 1
SFX 4164 0 tekilerde .

SFX 4165 N 1
SFX 4165 0 tekilerdeki .

SFX 4166 N 1
SFX 4166 0 tekilerinkiyse .

SFX 4167 N 1
SFX 4167 0 ümdendir .

SFX 4168 N 1
SFX 4168 0 ümüzdü .

SFX 4169 N 1
SFX 4169 0 üysem .

SFX 4170 N 1
SFX 4170 0 leriyseniz .

SFX 4171 N 1
SFX 4171 0 lerimdeydi .

SFX 4172 N 1
SFX 4172 0 nlesin .

SFX 4173 N 1
SFX 4173 0 imizdeydi .

SFX 4174 N 1
SFX 4174 0 inidir .

SFX 4175 N 1
SFX 4175 0 sindenseler .

SFX 4176 N 1
SFX 4176 0 sininkiydi .

SFX 4177 N 1
SFX 4177 0 'larını .

SFX 4178 N 1
SFX 4178 0 'larla .

SFX 4179 N 1
SFX 4179 0 saymışsın .

SFX 4180 N 1
SFX 4180 0 dakininki .

SFX 4181 N 1
SFX 4181 0 nunkinin .

SFX 4182 N 1
SFX 4182 0 mdurlar .

SFX 4183 N 1
SFX 4183 0 muzdadır .

SFX 4184 N 1
SFX 4184 0 nunkilerini .

SFX 4185 N 1
SFX 4185 0 sundanız .

SFX 4186 N 1
SFX 4186 0 sundaysan .

SFX 4187 N 1
SFX 4187 0 'suyla .

SFX 4188 N 1
SFX 4188 0 'suyuz .

SFX 4189 N 1
SFX 4189 0 tansınızdır .

SFX 4190 N 1
SFX 4190 0 tanlar .

SFX 4191 N 1
SFX 4191 0 umuzsun .

SFX 4192 N 1
SFX 4192 0 umuzsunuz .

SFX 4193 N 1
SFX 4193 0 unkine .

SFX 4194 N 1
SFX 4194 0 uydunuz .

SFX 4195 N 1
SFX 4195 0 umadır .

SFX 4196 N 1
SFX 4196 0 umasın .

SFX 4197 N 1
SFX 4197 0 umaydı .

SFX 4198 N 1
SFX 4198 0 unmuşçasına .

SFX 4199 N 1
SFX 4199 0 unmuşsan .

SFX 4200 N 1
SFX 4200 0 irlikleriyle .

SFX 4201 N 1
SFX 4201 0 urlukla .

SFX 4202 N 1
SFX 4202 0 urmuşçasına .

SFX 4203 N 1
SFX 4203 0 rdu .

SFX 4204 N 1
SFX 4204 0 rduk .

SFX 4205 N 1
SFX 4205 0 rmuş .

SFX 4206 N 1
SFX 4206 0 rum .

SFX 4207 N 1
SFX 4207 0 ruz .

SFX 4208 N 1
SFX 4208 0 yun .

SFX 4209 N 1
SFX 4209 0 umdayken .

SFX 4210 N 1
SFX 4210 0 larlarından .

SFX 4211 N 1
SFX 4211 0 ndunuz .

SFX 4212 N 1
SFX 4212 0 numdur .

SFX 4213 N 1
SFX 4213 0 naydım .

SFX 4214 N 1
SFX 4214 0 sundur .

SFX 4215 N 1
SFX 4215 0 ymuşlar .

SFX 4216 N 1
SFX 4216 0 muzsun .

SFX 4217 N 1
SFX 4217 0 muzsunuz .

SFX 4218 N 1
SFX 4218 0 muzunki .

SFX 4219 N 1
SFX 4219 0 muzunkiyle .

SFX 4220 N 1
SFX 4220 0 ımdadırlar .

SFX 4221 N 1
SFX 4221 0 ımdasınız .

SFX 4222 N 1
SFX 4222 0 ımladırlar .

SFX 4223 N 1
SFX 4223 0 nduk .

SFX 4224 N 1
SFX 4224 0 ndular .

SFX 4225 N 1
SFX 4225 0 nmuşsa .

SFX 4226 N 1
SFX 4226 0 nmuşsun .

SFX 4227 N 1
SFX 4227 0 nmuşum .

SFX 4228 N 1
SFX 4228 0 nmuşuz .

SFX 4229 N 1
SFX 4229 0 nsun .

SFX 4230 N 1
SFX 4230 0 larındasın .

SFX 4231 N 1
SFX 4231 0 larımızınkiyle .

SFX 4232 N 1
SFX 4232 0 udurlar .

SFX 4233 N 1
SFX 4233 0 umdular .

SFX 4234 N 1
SFX 4234 0 umdun .

SFX 4235 N 1
SFX 4235 0 umsun .

SFX 4236 N 1
SFX 4236 0 umsunuz .

SFX 4237 N 1
SFX 4237 0 umunkiyle .

SFX 4238 N 1
SFX 4238 0 umuzdu .

SFX 4239 N 1
SFX 4239 0 umuzdun .

SFX 4240 N 1
SFX 4240 0 umuzken .

SFX 4241 N 1
SFX 4241 0 umuzmuş .

SFX 4242 N 1
SFX 4242 0 umuzsa .

SFX 4243 N 1
SFX 4243 0 umuzsanız .

SFX 4244 N 1
SFX 4244 0 unuzdu .

SFX 4245 N 1
SFX 4245 0 unuzsa .

SFX 4246 N 1
SFX 4246 0 unuzum .

SFX 4247 N 1
SFX 4247 0 unuzuz .

SFX 4248 N 1
SFX 4248 0 usunuzdur .

SFX 4249 N 1
SFX 4249 0 uyduk .

SFX 4250 N 1
SFX 4250 0 uydun .

SFX 4251 N 1
SFX 4251 0 uymuşçasına .

SFX 4252 N 1
SFX 4252 0 uymuşsun .

SFX 4253 N 1
SFX 4253 0 uymuşum .

SFX 4254 N 1
SFX 4254 0 uysan .

SFX 4255 N 1
SFX 4255 0 uysanız .

SFX 4256 N 1
SFX 4256 0 uyumdur .

SFX 4257 N 1
SFX 4257 0 uyuzdur .

SFX 4258 N 1
SFX 4258 0 ymuşsa .

SFX 4259 N 1
SFX 4259 0 ymuşuzdur .

SFX 4260 N 1
SFX 4260 0 üyordun .

SFX 4261 N 1
SFX 4261 0 tüysem .

SFX 4262 N 1
SFX 4262 0 tüysen .

SFX 4263 N 1
SFX 4263 0 ürseler .

SFX 4264 N 1
SFX 4264 0 üyordular .

SFX 4265 N 1
SFX 4265 0 üyormuşçasına .

SFX 4266 N 1
SFX 4266 0 üyormuşsa .

SFX 4267 N 1
SFX 4267 0 üyorumdur .

SFX 4268 N 1
SFX 4268 0 'süyle .

SFX 4269 N 1
SFX 4269 0 ecekmişsin .

SFX 4270 N 1
SFX 4270 0 dekilerdi .

SFX 4271 N 1
SFX 4271 0 dekilerine .

SFX 4272 N 1
SFX 4272 0 imizdekiler .

SFX 4273 N 1
SFX 4273 0 imizdeyiz .

SFX 4274 N 1
SFX 4274 0 indekilerdir .

SFX 4275 N 1
SFX 4275 0 indekilerinde .

SFX 4276 N 1
SFX 4276 0 indeyseler .

SFX 4277 N 1
SFX 4277 0 ininkiler .

SFX 4278 N 1
SFX 4278 0 lerindeydiler .

SFX 4279 N 1
SFX 4279 0 ermişsiniz .

SFX 4280 N 1
SFX 4280 0 sündeyiz .

SFX 4281 N 1
SFX 4281 0 sündeyken .

SFX 4282 N 1
SFX 4282 0 yeceksinizdir .

SFX 4283 N 1
SFX 4283 0 müşsem .

SFX 4284 N 1
SFX 4284 0 müşmüş .

SFX 4285 N 1
SFX 4285 0 ürdünüz .

SFX 4286 N 1
SFX 4286 0 ürlerken .

SFX 4287 N 1
SFX 4287 0 tüyseler .

SFX 4288 N 1
SFX 4288 0 ümce .

SFX 4289 N 1
SFX 4289 0 ümdeydi .

SFX 4290 N 1
SFX 4290 0 ümdeyim .

SFX 4291 N 1
SFX 4291 0 müşlerdir .

SFX 4292 N 1
SFX 4292 0 üyorsunuzdur .

SFX 4293 N 1
SFX 4293 0 üyormuşsun .

SFX 4294 N 1
SFX 4294 0 üyormuşsunuz .

SFX 4295 N 1
SFX 4295 0 üyoruzdur .

SFX 4296 N 1
SFX 4296 0 süydüm .

SFX 4297 N 1
SFX 4297 0 süymüşüz .

SFX 4298 N 1
SFX 4298 0 süyüz .

SFX 4299 N 1
SFX 4299 0 sünce .

SFX 4300 N 1
SFX 4300 0 'mi .

SFX 4301 N 1
SFX 4301 0 alarken .

SFX 4302 N 1
SFX 4302 0 duyduk .

SFX 4303 N 1
SFX 4303 0 tasındır .

SFX 4304 N 1
SFX 4304 0 mcasına .

SFX 4305 N 1
SFX 4305 0 mayken .

SFX 4306 N 1
SFX 4306 0 mdadırlar .

SFX 4307 N 1
SFX 4307 0 mdakilerle .

SFX 4308 N 1
SFX 4308 0 mdalardı .

SFX 4309 N 1
SFX 4309 0 mdalardır .

SFX 4310 N 1
SFX 4310 0 mdalarmış .

SFX 4311 N 1
SFX 4311 0 mdalarsa .

SFX 4312 N 1
SFX 4312 0 mdasınızdır .

SFX 4313 N 1
SFX 4313 0 mdaydık .

SFX 4314 N 1
SFX 4314 0 mdaydınız .

SFX 4315 N 1
SFX 4315 0 mdayızdır .

SFX 4316 N 1
SFX 4316 0 mdaymışım .

SFX 4317 N 1
SFX 4317 0 mdaymışız .

SFX 4318 N 1
SFX 4318 0 mdaymışlar .

SFX 4319 N 1
SFX 4319 0 mdaysak .

SFX 4320 N 1
SFX 4320 0 mdaysalar .

SFX 4321 N 1
SFX 4321 0 mdaysam .

SFX 4322 N 1
SFX 4322 0 mdaysan .

SFX 4323 N 1
SFX 4323 0 mdaysanız .

SFX 4324 N 1
SFX 4324 0 mdular .

SFX 4325 N 1
SFX 4325 0 mduysa .

SFX 4326 N 1
SFX 4326 0 mmuşçasına .

SFX 4327 N 1
SFX 4327 0 msun .

SFX 4328 N 1
SFX 4328 0 umdadır .

SFX 4329 N 1
SFX 4329 0 umdakiler .

SFX 4330 N 1
SFX 4330 0 umdakilerdir .

SFX 4331 N 1
SFX 4331 0 umdakilere .

SFX 4332 N 1
SFX 4332 0 umdakilerin .

SFX 4333 N 1
SFX 4333 0 umdakilerle .

SFX 4334 N 1
SFX 4334 0 umdayım .

SFX 4335 N 1
SFX 4335 0 umdayız .

SFX 4336 N 1
SFX 4336 0 umdaysanız .

SFX 4337 N 1
SFX 4337 0 umuzdakiler .

SFX 4338 N 1
SFX 4338 0 umuzdakilere .

SFX 4339 N 1
SFX 4339 0 umuzdakilerin .

SFX 4340 N 1
SFX 4340 0 umuzdaysa .

SFX 4341 N 1
SFX 4341 0 undakileri .

SFX 4342 N 1
SFX 4342 0 undakilerle .

SFX 4343 N 1
SFX 4343 0 undalardı .

SFX 4344 N 1
SFX 4344 0 undalarsa .

SFX 4345 N 1
SFX 4345 0 undasın .

SFX 4346 N 1
SFX 4346 0 undasındır .

SFX 4347 N 1
SFX 4347 0 undasınızdır .

SFX 4348 N 1
SFX 4348 0 undaydılar .

SFX 4349 N 1
SFX 4349 0 undaydınız .

SFX 4350 N 1
SFX 4350 0 undaymışız .

SFX 4351 N 1
SFX 4351 0 undaysak .

SFX 4352 N 1
SFX 4352 0 undaysalar .

SFX 4353 N 1
SFX 4353 0 undaysam .

SFX 4354 N 1
SFX 4354 0 undaysan .

SFX 4355 N 1
SFX 4355 0 undaysanız .

SFX 4356 N 1
SFX 4356 0 mundu .

SFX 4357 N 1
SFX 4357 0 mundun .

SFX 4358 N 1
SFX 4358 0 munki .

SFX 4359 N 1
SFX 4359 0 munsa .

SFX 4360 N 1
SFX 4360 0 unuzdakiler .
