dictionaries/tr/index.dic
dinlet/33,83,107,109,110,111,112,119,120,272,278,318,319,341,342,344,413,526,529,617,618,626,656,658,659,660,670,671,676,677,678,680,682,683,684,686,687,691,697,698,699,700,701,703,704,705,706,708,709,710,711,715,717,719,721,848,983,1174,1175,1227,1293,1295,2740,4163
dip/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,327,328,329,333,335,336,339,340,364,369,370,371,374,381,382,421,493,1164,1169,1170,1174,1192,1237,1262,1263,1264,1326,1426,1427,1861,1967,2455,2718,2877,2966,3027,3732,4103,4164,4165,4166
dişi/9999,3,6,7,35,36,37,38,39,41,252,253,255,256,257,258,259,260,313,314,315,333,335,339,349,355,359,365,421,491,1163,1461,1463,2275,4170
diyecek/35,36,37,38,39,41,255,256,326,328,329,331,332,333,335,336,338,365,366,367,368,369,371,373,374,382,421,1193,1268,4171
dizgi/9999,2,3,5,6,7,8,35,38,53,252,256,257,258,259,260,313,314,315,323,348,349,359,401,402,403,1489,1985,3006,4172
doğuş/11,14,15,22,23,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,49,50,52,91,125,128,223,428,514,515,593,664,665,1102,1103,1106,1107,1108,1109,1110,1111,1114,1116,1177,1339,1340,1419,1432,1626,1656,2149,2765,3391,4189
dönüşüş/44,46,4291
hit/33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,255,256,261,262,263,267,272,273,274,275,276,277,282,283,288,318,319,326,327,328,329,333,335,338,339,364,365,373,381,421,529,539,548,983,1163,1193,1268,1459,1461,1463,1670,2141,4148,4161,4500
kamu/13,14,15,17,19,20,21,23,25,26,27,28,49,50,53,54,57,125,128,139,486,487,516,517,534,553,662,733,783,784,785,941,943,944,1335,1337,1343,1434,1435,1436,1537,1625,1630,1635,1638,1640,1707,2113,2114,2284,2453,2464,3668,4181,5403
kuşak/14,15,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,48,49,50,52,59,91,92,121,122,123,124,125,128,141,163,178,210,211,224,428,437,439,440,441,524,581,583,585,589,593,625,743,786,796,834,860,862,866,870,906,934,961,985,1054,1069,1397,1416,1432,1773,2013,2014,2087,2220,2679,3687,4190,4892,5734
leh/33,35,36,37,38,39,42,252,254,255,261,263,264,266,267,269,270,272,273,275,276,277,280,283,287,335,379,649,965,967,968,970,971,1184,1188,1245,1246,1251,1254,1352,1426,1850,1852,1855,1872,1876,1877,1882,1883,1885,1886,1887,1891,3141,4173,5745,5746,5747,5748,5749
lokum/14,15,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,32,48,49,50,123,125,128,224,435,439,577,664,665,1103,1107,1108,1109,1110,1111,1116,1339,1419,2148,2149,4191
mekik/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,333,335,339,363,1460,4142
muadil/35,38,39,252,254,255,256,261,262,263,267,268,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,281,282,283,284,328,329,331,332,333,335,336,339,367,368,371,373,376,382,501,539,543,546,548,968,970,1193,1358,4143
Ö/4268
öğün/9999,2,3,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,41,44,45,46,252,253,254,255,256,283,319,329,333,335,336,339,365,368,370,373,374,381,382,420,658,659,660,718,768,774,776,777,1118,1119,1120,1122,1193,1260,1329,1621,1652,1653,1654,1665,1681,1682,1683,1687,1794,1800,1820,1822,1823,1825,4168,4810
ölçek/34,35,36,37,38,39,41,42,43,252,253,254,255,256,283,287,288,318,319,326,327,329,331,333,335,336,339,340,365,373,374,382,712,1164,1266,2968,4164
sakin/35,36,37,38,39,40,41,254,255,256,267,273,274,275,276,277,282,283,326,327,328,329,331,332,333,334,335,338,339,371,373,374,376,377,421,494,495,501,535,539,541,542,543,544,545,546,548,654,1253,1268,1669,1671,1672,1673,1868,2221,2940,3262,3280,4146
seyret/318,319,341,344,413,526,527,529,618,656,657,658,659,660,714,715,717,718,719,720,721,722,857,858,983,1171,1174,1175,1227,1283,1284,1285,1291,1292,1293,1294,1297,1298,1411,1529,2579,2740,2795,3022,3023,3113,4150,4651
Şerif/303,304,305,306,981,1341,1342,4157,6258
Tatar/14,15,23,26,27,28,49,217,222,226,230,4177
tenor/11,13,14,15,20,22,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,49,125,224,435,661,662,664,665,1108,1109,1116,1177,1339,4193
TIR/217,219,222,225,226,227,230,1324,2004,2007,2033,2274,4178,6055,6334,6335
yem/9999,2,3,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,105,252,253,254,255,256,261,262,267,270,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,282,283,284,326,327,329,331,333,335,339,365,370,374,383,539,682,970,972,977,1352,2570,2949,4174
yoğrum/23,32,4251
zürriyet/35,38,43,256,261,264,266,267,270,274,275,276,281,283,335,654,967,4159
